Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MISSISSIPPI HEADWATERS BOARD.new text end new text begin $175,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $175,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Mississippi Headwaters Board for up to 50 percent of the cost of implementing the comprehensive plan for the upper Mississippi River within areas under the board's jurisdiction. By December 15, 2027, the board must submit a report to the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources on the activities funded under this section and the progress made in implementing the comprehensive plan. new text end